Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB235.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) Except as otherwise provided in chapter 2, article 47 of
the Kansas Statutes Annotated, and amendments thereto, and subsection
(b), on and after January 1, 2028, it shall be unlawful for any person to
sell, offer for sale or use or distribute within the state any seed that has
been coated or treated with a pesticide that has one or more of the
following active ingredients: Clothianidin, imidacloprid, thiamethoxam,
dinotefuran or acetamiprid.
(b) The governor may, by executive order, suspend the prohibition in
subsection (a) for a period of not more than one year, if the governor
determines, after consulting with the secretary of agriculture, that there is a
lack of commercially available seed that has not been coated or treated
with a pesticide that has such active ingredient or the purchase of a seed
that has not been coated or treated with a pesticide that has such active
ingredient would result in undue financial hardship to agricultural
producers. Any such executive order shall specify the type of seed for
which the prohibition is suspended.
(c) This section shall be a part of and supplemental to chapter 2,
article 47 of the Kansas Statutes Annotated, and amendments thereto.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.